Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.279

Administrative dissolution—Commencement of proceeding.

The secretary of state may commence a proceeding to administratively dissolve a limited liability company under the circumstances and procedures provided in Article 6 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7114; 2015 c 188 s 54.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.